Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4859
Subordination of claims for noncooperation.

If an ancillary receiver in another state or foreign country, whether called by that name or not, fails to transfer to the domiciliary liquidator in this state any assets within his or her control other than special deposits, diminished only by the expenses of the ancillary receivership, if any, the claims filed in the ancillary receivership, other than special deposit claims or secured claims, shall be placed in the class of claims under subdivision (8) of section 44-4842.

Laws 1989, LB 319, § 59;

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 27.